Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Volunteer Inmate Work Program

4-6-201. Creation of program — Criteria.

There is established a volunteer inmate work program in the department of correction for minimum risk inmates.

The department shall, by rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, establish criteria for participation in such program. Such rules and regulations shall also develop criteria for work projects pursuant to such program, including, but not limited to, the following:

Public works projects;

Conservation projects; and

Rehabilitation of cemeteries.

Acts 1981, ch. 421, § 1.

Cross-References. Correctional work programs, title 41, ch. 22.

Felons and other prisoners to work on roads, §§41-2-123 —41-2-125.

Use of inmates to remove litter on acquired municipal property, §13-21-204.

4-6-202. Funding.

Funds available for the development and implementation of a volunteer inmate work program and for construction of a facility or facilities to house inmates participating in such programs to help alleviate over-crowding in existing institutions shall be as provided by the general appropriations act. Any such facility shall be constructed by volunteer prison labor.

Acts 1981, ch. 421, § 2.